Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-240 Fine in lieu. (a) Upon the
hearing of an appeal from an order suspending, revoking, or refusing to extend
any license issued under this article, the court may impose a fine of not more
than $10,000 in lieu of the commissioner's action, and payment of the fine
within ten days shall reinstate, restore or extend, the license if:

(1) The court finds that the licensee is guilty of
violation of the law; and

(2) The court deems the suspension, revocation, or
refusal too severe a penalty under the facts as found.

(b) If it appears that a license of the
licensee has previously been suspended, revoked, or refused for a similar
offense, the court shall not have jurisdiction to impose a fine in lieu of the
commissioner's action. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next